Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.030

Advertising—Restrictions—Records.

A seller of travel shall not advertise that any travel services are or may be available unless he or she has, prior to the advertisement, determined that the product advertised was available at the time the advertising was placed. This determination can be made by the seller of travel either by use of an airline computer reservation system, or by written confirmation from the vendor whose program is being advertised.

It is the responsibility of the seller of travel to keep written or printed documentation of the steps taken to verify that the advertised offer was available at the time the advertising was placed. These records are to be maintained for at least one year after the placement of the advertisement.

[ 1999 c 238 s 1; 1996 c 180 s 2; 1994 c 237 s 10; 1986 c 283 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1999 c 238: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1999 c 238 s 8.]

Effective date—1996 c 180: See note following RCW 19.138.021.